Missouri, session 2026, HB3001.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 168.300, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 168.300 and 168.301, to read as follows:
168.300. 1. Every school district in this state including special school districts may
adopt policies and regulations providing for deductions from the compensation of the
district's employees whenever a request to do so is presented to the board by a group of ten or
more employees.
2. Deductions shall be made from compensation earned by the employee and shall be
remitted to the appropriate company, association, or organization as authorized by the
employee within fifteen days following the deduction.
3. Deductions may be made for, but not limited to, the following: credit unions, tax
sheltered annuities, individual retirement accounts, [membership dues,] voluntary
contributions, or group insurance premiums.
4. A board of education when deducting amounts from the compensation of
employees as directed by the employee shall not be liable for any good faith error.
5. The school board shall determine the cost of compliance with this section and shall
deduct, in addition to the amount to be paid to any entity for which deduction is authorized,
the cost of compliance with the request of the employee.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3001 2
6. The various subsections of this section shall be deemed severable and if a
subsection of this section is declared invalid or unconstitutional, then such declaration shall
not affect the remaining subsections.
7. School districts shall not deduct or collect dues, fees, or contributions from the
pay of a district employee on behalf of a professional association or political fund.
168.301. 1. As used in this section, "professional association" means a lawful
association that is composed of school district employees and exists for the purpose of
dealing with school district employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages,
rates of pay, hours of employment, or other terms and conditions of employment.
"Professional association" includes:
(1) Any benevolent, social, or fraternal association allowed under section
105.510; and
(2) A professional employee association exempt from taxation under Section 501
(c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
2. (1) A school district employee may join or terminate membership in a
professional association at any time.
(2) A professional association or a school district employer shall not place a
restriction on the time that a school district employee may join or terminate
membership in a professional association.
✔